Utah statutes.
31A-26-204.   License classifications.

A resident or nonresident license issued under this chapter shall be issued under the classifications described under Subsections (1), (2), and (3).  A classification describes the matters to be considered under a prerequisite education or examination required of license applicants under Sections 31A-26-206 and 31A-26-207.

(1)  Independent adjuster license classifications include:

(a)  accident and health insurance, including related service insurance under Chapter 7, Nonprofit Health Service Insurance Corporations, or Chapter 8, Health Maintenance Organizations and Limited Health Plans;

(b)  property and casualty insurance, including a surety or other bond;

(c)  crop insurance; and

(d)  workers' compensation insurance.

(2)  Public adjuster license classifications include:

(a)  accident and health insurance, including related service insurance under Chapter 7 or 8;

(b)  property and casualty insurance, including a surety or other bond;

(c)  crop insurance; and

(d)  workers' compensation insurance.

(3) (a)  The commissioner may by rule:

(i)  recognize other independent adjuster or public adjuster license classifications as to other kinds of insurance not listed under Subsection (1); and

(ii)  create license classifications that grant only part of the authority arising under another license class.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), for purpose of title insurance, the Title and Escrow Commission may make the rules provided for in Subsection (3)(a), subject to Section 31A-2-404.



Amended by Chapter 349, 2009 General Session

